Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1313
Unlawful use of a white cane or guide dog; penalty.

(1) A person commits unlawfully using a white cane or guide dog if he is not blind as defined by law and carries, displays, or otherwise makes use of a white cane or guide dog.

(2) Such use of a white cane or the use of a guide dog by a person shall be officially recognized as an indication that the bearer is blind.

(3) Unlawful use of a white cane or guide dog is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 297.